apertium-wal.wal.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns

taa:taa RONOUN-1-S ; ! "I/me"
ta:ta PRONOUN-1-S ; ! "I/me"
nu:nu PRONOUN-1-P ; ! "you"
ne:ne PRONOUN-2-S ; ! "you"
intte:intte PRONOUN-2-P ; ! "you"
ba:ba PRONOUN-3-S ; ! "himself/herself"
bantta:bantta PRONOUN-3-P ; ! "themselve"
                                            
a:a PRONOUN-3-SG-A ; ! "him"  
a:a PRONOUN-3-SG-O ; ! "him"  
aa:aa PRONOUN-3-SG-O ; ! "he" 
i:i PRONOUN-3-SG-N ; ! "she"
ee:ee PRONOUN-3-SG-I ; ! ""
o:o PRONOUN-3-SGF-A ; ! "him" 
i:i PRONOUN-3-SGF-O ; ! "he"  
ii:ii PRONOUN-3-SGF-O ; ! "she"  
a:a PRONOUN-3-SGF-N ; ! "she"
eta:eta PRONOUN-3-SGF-I ; ! "them"
eta:eta PRONOUN-3-PL-A ; ! "they"
etaa:etaa PRONOUN-3-PL-O ; ! "they"  
etaa:etaa PRONOUN-3-PL-O ; ! "they"  
eti:eti PRONOUN-3-PL-N ; ! "they"
etee:etee PRONOUN-3-PL-I ; ! "you"

LEXICON PRONOUN-1-S

%<prn%>%<p1%>%<sing%>: PRONOUN-1-S-FORMS ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-1S-FORMS

%<abs%>:na INFL-ABS-PRONOUN ; ! "me"
%<obl%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "I"
%<obl%>:a INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "I" ! Dir/LR
%<obl%>:na INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "me" ! Dir/LR
%<obl%>:naa INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "me" ! Dir/LR
%<nom%>: INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "I"
%<nom%>:a INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "I" ! Dir/LR
%<nom%>:n INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "I" ! Dir/LR
%<nom%>:ani INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "I" ! Dir/LR
%<inter%>:nee INFL-INTER-PRONOUN ; ! "am i"
%<voc%>:noo INFL-VOC-PRONOUN ; ! "i"

LEXICON PRONOUN-1-P

%<prn%>%<p1%>%<plr%>: PRONOUN-1-P-FORMS ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-1-P-FORMS

%<abs%>:na INFL-ABS-PRONOUN ; ! "us"
%<obl%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:u INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:na INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "us"
%<obl%>:naa INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>: INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>:u INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>:n INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>:uni INFL-NOM-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<inter%>:nee INFL-INTER-PRONOUN ; ! "are we"
%<voc%>:noo INFL-VOC-PRONOUN ; ! "we"

LEXICON PRONOUN-2-S

%<prn%>%<p2%>%<sing%>: PRONOUN-2-S-FORMS ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-2-S-FORMS

%<abs%>:na INFL-ABS-PRONOUN ; ! "us"
%<obl%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:e INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:na INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:naa INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>:e INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>:n INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>:eni INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<inter%>:nee INFL-INTER-PRONOUN ; ! "are we"
%<voc%>:noo INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"

LEXICON PRONOUN-2-P

%<prn%>%<p2%>%<plr%>: PRONOUN-2-P-FORMS ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-2-P-FORMS

%<abs%>:na INFL-ABS-PRONOUN ; ! "us"
%<obl%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:e INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:na INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:naa INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<nom%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<inter%>:nee INFL-INTER-PRONOUN ; ! "are we"
%<voc%>:noo INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-S

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<ref%>%<sing%>: PRONOUN-3-S-FORMS ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-S-FORMS

%<abs%>:na INFL-ABS-PRONOUN ; ! "us"
%<obl%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:a INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:na INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:naa INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<inter%>:nee INFL-INTER-PRONOUN ; ! "are we"

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-P

%<prn%>%<p3%>%<ref%>%<plr%>: PRONOUN-3-P-FORMS ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-P-FORMS

%<abs%>:na INFL-ABS-PRONOUN ; ! "us"
%<obl%>: INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:a INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:na INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<obl%>:naa INFL-OBL-PRONOUN ; ! "we"
%<inter%>:nee INFL-INTER-PRONOUN ; ! "are we"

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SG-A

%<prn%>%<abs%>%<p3%>%<masc%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SG-O

%<prn%>%<obl%>%<p3%>%<masc%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SG-N

%<prn%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<masc%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SG-I

%<prn%>%<inter%>%<p3%>%<masc%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SGF-A

%<prn%>%<abs%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SGF-O

%<prn%>%<obl%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SGF-N

%<prn%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-SGF-I

%<prn%>%<inter%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-PL-A

%<prn%>%<abs%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-PL-O

%<prn%>%<obl%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-PL-N

%<prn%>%<nom%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-3-PL-I

%<prn%>%<inter%>%<p3%>%<fem%>%<sing%>: # ;

LEXICON INFL-ABS-PRONOUN

# ; 

LEXICON INFL-OBL-PRONOUN

# ;
INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON ;

LEXICON INFL-OBL-PRONOUN-COMMON

# ; 
POSTPOS ;
PRON-NOMINALIZERS-OBL ;

LEXICON INFL-NOM-PRONOUN

# ; 

LEXICON INFL-INTER-PRONOUN

# ; 

LEXICON INFL-VOC-PRONOUN

# ; 

LEXICON PRON-NOMINALIZERS-OBL

# ;
VERB-Nmlz ;

LEXICON PRON-NOMINALIZERS-OBL-INFL

# ;
POSTPOS ;

LEXICON POSTPOS ! Postpositions that follow oblique case

# ;
%+ra%<post%>:%>ra # ;
%+kko%<post%>:%>kko # ;
%+ppe%<post%>:%>ppe # ;
%+ssi%<post%>:%>ssi # ;
%+ni%<post%>:%>ni # ;
%+ni%<post%>:%>n # ; ! Dir/LR
%+daani%<post%>:daani # ;
%+daani%<post%>:dan # ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ITJ !

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON ADJ !

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON PREP !

%<prep%>: # ;

LEXICON CONN !

%<conn%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV !

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-1 ! 

%<num%>:%> NUM-1-INFL ;

LEXICON NUM-1-INFL

%<count%>:a # ;
%<abs%>:uwa # ;
%<obl%>:i # ;
%<inter%>:oo # ;

LEXICON NUM-2 ! 

%<num%>:%> NUM-2-INFL ;

LEXICON NUM-2-INFL

%<count%>:a # ;
%<abs%>:a # ;
%<obl%>:u # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;

LEXICON NUM-6 ! 

%<num%>:%> NUM-6-INFL ;

LEXICON NUM-6-INFL

%<count%>:a # ;
%<abs%>:a # ;
%<obl%>: # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;

LEXICON NUM-11 !

%<num%>:%> NUM-11-INFL ;

LEXICON NUM-11-INFL

%<count%>:o # ;
%<abs%>:e # ;
%<abs%>:o # ;
%<obl%>:i # ;
%<obl%>:e # ;
%<inter%>:ee # ;

LEXICON Punctuation

%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
…%<sent%>:… # ; 
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%-%<guio%>:%-%- # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%−%<guio%>:%− # ; 
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
%–%<guio%>:%– # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;

	






! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

LEXICON Interjections
aa''a:aa''a ITJ ; ! "oh, no"
aayyee'ana:aayyee'ana ITJ ; ! "woe, alas"
biittaw:biittaw ITJ ; ! "woe, alas"
abe:abe ITJ ; ! "yes, Sir"
ahaa:ahaa ITJ ; ! "aha"
allawdo:allawdo ITJ ; ! "contentment for you"
ane:ane ITJ ; ! "just"
arikiyay:arikiyay ITJ ; ! "shoo away"
arra:arra ITJ ; ! "instigating word"
assallo:assallo ITJ ; ! "may God restore"
azik:azik ITJ ; ! "aziki, adiki"
aabboo'ana:aabboo'ana ITJ ;
aayyee:aayyee ITJ ;
chachacha:chachacha ITJ ; ! "sizzle"
chii:chii ITJ ; ! "no"
demmakka:demmakka ITJ ; ! "you cannot get"
doona:doona ITJ ; ! "let them live"
ee:ee ITJ ; ! "yes"
Elohee:Elohee ITJ ; ! "my God"
ezggo:ezggo ITJ ;
hoola:hoola ITJ ;
gido:gido ITJ ; ! "let it be"
pala:pala ITJ ; 
kehaa:kehaa ITJ ;
haha:haha ITJ ; ! "laughter (funny feeling)"
hammu:hammu ITJ ; ! "welcome"
hay''i:hay''i ITJ ; ! "oh no (disapproval)"
aayyee:aayyee ITJ ;
hegeetihoo:hegeetihoo ITJ ; ! "there they are"
hirkka:hirkka ITJ ; ! "order to its place (of cows)"
horro:horro ITJ ; ! "be quick"
immeet:immeet ITJ ; ! "yes, yes"
ixxisi:ixxisi ITJ ; ! "no"
kichchiki:kichchiki ITJ ;
koshoshu:koshoshu ITJ ; ! "rustling (an expression of rustling sound)"
lo''uwan:lo''uwan ITJ ; ! "good-bye
naawa:naawa ITJ ; ! "swear, never"
noore:noore ITJ ; ! "welcome"
piskki:piskki ITJ ; ! "scatter, an expression to say when something scattered suddenly"
salqqi:salqqi ITJ ; ! "feel pain (of internal body)"
sirphphi:sirphphi ITJ ;
tolkku:tolkku ITJ ; ! "break (break sound)"
waaha:waaha ITJ ; ! "stop, a word used to stop or control oxen"
xoqqu:xoqqu ITJ ; ! "high, go high (said to an ox when ploughing)"
yooqe:yooqe ITJ ;
LEXICON Adjectives
allaga:allaga ADJ ; ! "foreign, strange, alien, unrelated, not a blood relative"
axiraaro:axiraaro ADJ ; ! "prideful, conceited, boastful, arrogant, haughty, proud, fussy"
baqe:baqe ADJ ; ! "clear, obvious, open, public"
biz''iya:biz''iya ADJ ; ! "stinging, painful"
bulla:bulla ADJ ; ! "grey (animal's colour)"
carqqa:carqqa ADJ ; ! "untidy, messy"
corppoppa:corppoppa ADJ ; ! "overgrown (tall grass), graceless, uneven"
danddayiya:danddayiya ADJ ; ! "able, capable"
do'a:do'a ADJ ; ! "cruel, fierce, ruthless"
dummayiya:dummayiya ADJ ; ! "opposite, antonymous"
gadiidaama:gadiidaama ADJ ; ! "a person having long sideburns"
geella:geella ADJ ; ! "crooked, curved, hooked, bent, not straight"
gooba:gooba ADJ ; ! "clever, brave, adroit, smart, skillful, courageous, plucky, valorous, audacious"
ha''issaw:ha''issaw ADJ ; ! "tentative, teporary, tentative"
hayqqida:hayqqida ADJ ; ! "dead"
hoskkiina:hoskkiina ADJ ; ! "gossipy, one who does not keep a secret"
jinjjilla:jinjjilla ADJ ; ! "rigid, obstinate, stubborn, mulish"
kayma:kayma ADJ ; ! "old, mature"
kotte:kotte ADJ ; ! "large (number of related families)"
lasttiqe:lasttiqe ADJ ; ! "plastic"
meeseele:meeseele ADJ ; ! "bald"
murtte:murtte ADJ ; ! "decisive, resolute, daring, strong minded, determined"
parggaga:parggaga ADJ ; ! "bigger, enlarged"
qaw'e:qaw'e ADJ ; ! "green, unripe, immature"
salqqisalqqa:salqqisalqqa ADJ ; ! "lush"
sima:sima ADJ ; ! "vice"
tuyyeeba:tuyyeeba ADJ ; ! "penniless, destitute, poor"
xettella:xettella ADJ ; ! "stout, fat, chubby, obese, flabby"
yukukka:yukukka ADJ ; ! "short and fat"
baadoochche:baadoochche ADJ ;
masudhdha:masudhdha ADJ ;
wozani:wozani ADJ ;
ciishsha:ciishsha ADJ ;
innaaboote:innaaboote ADJ ;
eexxiya:eexxiya ADJ ;
ooshshanchcha:ooshshanchcha ADJ ;
baaso:baaso ADJ ;
kessenna:kessenna ADJ ;
malddadda:malddadda ADJ ;
ushachcha:ushachcha ADJ ;
moore:moore ADJ ;
banne:banne ADJ ;
gita:gita ADJ ;
huuphiya:huuphiya ADJ ;
miiqqiya:miiqqiya ADJ ;
LEXICON Adverbs
hagaa:hagaa ADV ; ! ""
ishatettan:ishatettan ADV ; ! "fraternally, cordially, sympathetically"
ha''ippe:ha''ippe ADV ; ! ""
aybyssi:aybyssi ADV ; ! "why"
ha''ippe:ha''ippe ADV ; ! ""
sinttan:sinttan ADV ; ! "before, forward"
gakkanaashin:gakkanaashin ADV ; ! "Laa ayba azalla asee"
simmin:simmin ADV ; ! ""
kiyosan:kiyosan ADV ; ! ""
doommin:doommin ADV ; ! "from now on"
beni:beni ADV ; ! ""
ha:ha ADV ; ! ""
waana:waana ADV ; ! "how"
adda:adda ADV ; ! "sure, certain, fully (to know for a fact)"
wora:wora ADV ; ! ""
haattappe:haattappe ADV ; ! ""
hirkki:hirkki ADV ; ! "downhill, below"
aymalee:aymalee ADV ; ! "how, how is it"
aattidi:aattidi ADV ; ! "more, best"
awdenne:awdenne ADV ; ! "anytime, whenever, some time in the future"
hodde:hodde ADV ; ! "so"
aykkobaa:aykkobaa ADV ; ! "no matter"
xombbixombban:xombbixombban ADV ; ! "irregularly"
huuphiyan:huuphiyan ADV ; ! ""
dan:dan ADV ; ! "as"
dirbban:dirbban ADV ; ! ""
ayssi:ayssi ADV ; ! "why, for what reason"
qociridi:qociridi ADV ; ! "methodically, thoroughly, exhaustively"
xon''a:xon''a ADV ; ! "only"
addiniitaa:addiniitaa ADV ; ! "really, a word used to identify the reality of something"
ayssanaw:ayssanaw ADV ; ! "why, for what reason"
aybissi:aybissi ADV ; ! "why, an adverb used to ask or talk about the reason, purpose, or cause of something"
kuttan:kuttan ADV ; ! "time, time to do something, number of events"
ooni:ooni ADV ; ! ""
wonttifen:wonttifen ADV ; ! "after tomorrow, the day after tomorrow, two days after"
heezzutoo:heezzutoo ADV ; ! "thrice"
milxxi:milxxi ADV ; ! ""
doommin:doommin ADV ; ! "Ha''ippe doomin, I sijaaraa uyenna"
hannoode:hannoode ADV ; ! "at this time, by this time, nowadays"
guuran:guuran ADV ; ! "maallado xoolinttiya NNN Maallado xoolinttee poo'ees"
dosennan:dosennan ADV ; ! "by force"
xalaalan:xalaalan ADV ; ! "alone, privately"
kumettan:kumettan ADV ; ! "generally, in general"
woniisappe:woniisappe ADV ; ! "wonikka ADV ; ! "still"
